Washington statutes.
RCW 40.14.024

Division of archives and records management—Local government archives account.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5167-S.SL) ***

The local government archives account is created in the state treasury. All receipts collected by the county auditors under RCW 40.14.027 and 36.22.175 for local government services, such as providing records schedule compliance, security microfilm inspection and storage, archival preservation, cataloging, and indexing for local government records and digital data and access to those records and data through the regional branch archives of the division of archives and records management, must be deposited into the account, and expenditures from the account may be used only for these purposes. Any amounts deposited in the account in accordance with RCW 36.22.175(4) may only be expended for the purposes authorized under that provision as follows: No more than fifty percent of funding may be used for the attorney general's consultation program and the state archivist's training services, and the remainder is to be used for the competitive grant program.

[ 2017 c 303 s 5; 2008 c 328 s 6005; 2003 c 163 s 3.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Severability—Effective date—2008 c 328: See notes following RCW 43.155.050.